Nebraska, session 109, LB1063.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1063 LB1063
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 8-2701, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
8-2701 Sections 8-2701 to 8-2742 and sections 5 to 8 of this act
shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act.
Sec. 2. Section 8-2702, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
8-2702 For purposes of the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act:
(1) Acting in concert means persons knowingly acting together with a
common goal of jointly acquiring control of a licensee whether or not
pursuant to an express agreement;
(2) Applicant means a person filing an application for a license
under the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act;
(3) Authorized delegate means a person designated by the licensee to
engage in money transmission on behalf of the licensee;
(4) Average daily money transmission liability means the amount of
the licensee's outstanding money transmission obligations in this state
at the end of each day in a given period of time, added together, and
divided by the total number of days in the given period of time. For
purposes of calculating average daily money transmission liability under
the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act for any licensee required to do so,
the given period of time shall be each calendar quarter;
(5) Closed loop stored value means stored value that is redeemable
by the issuer of such stored value only for goods or services provided by
the issuer or affiliates of such issuer or franchisees of the issuer or
affiliates of such franchisees, except to the extent the stored value is
required by applicable law to be redeemable in cash for the cash value of
the stored value;
(6)(a) Control means:
(i) Direct or indirect power over the vote of at least twenty-five
percent of the outstanding voting shares or voting interests of a
licensee or person in control of a licensee;
-2-

LB1063 LB1063
2026 2026
(ii) The power to elect or appoint a majority of key individuals,
executive officers, managers, directors, trustees, or other persons that
have managerial authority of a person in control of a licensee; or
(iii) The power to exercise, directly or indirectly, a controlling
influence over the management or policies of a licensee or person in
control of a licensee.
(b) For purposes of determining the percentage of a person
controlled by any other person, the person's interest shall be aggregated
with the interest of any other immediate family member, including the
person's spouse, parents, children, siblings, mothers-in-law, fathers-in-
law, sons-in-law, daughters-in-law, brothers-in-law, and sisters-in-law,
and any other person who shares such person's residence;
(7) Department means the Department of Banking and Finance;
(8) Director means the Director of Banking and Finance;
(9) Eligible rating means a credit rating of any of the three
highest rating categories provided by an eligible rating service, whereby
each category may include rating category modifiers such as plus or minus
for Standard and Poor's Corporation or the equivalent for any other
eligible rating service. Long-term credit ratings are deemed eligible if
the rating is equal to A- or higher by Standard and Poor's Corporation,
or the equivalent from any other eligible rating service. Short-term
credit ratings are deemed eligible if the rating is equal to or higher
than A-2 or SP-2 by Standard and Poor's Corporation or the equivalent
from any other eligible rating service. In the event that ratings differ
among eligible rating services, the highest rating shall apply when
determining whether a security bears an eligible rating.
(10) Eligible rating service means any nationally recognized
statistical rating organization approved by the Securities and Exchange
Commission and any other organization designated by the director by rule
or order;
(11) Federally insured depository financial institution means a
-3-

LB1063 LB1063
2026 2026
bank, credit union, savings and loan association, trust company, savings
association, savings bank, industrial bank, or industrial loan company
organized under the laws of the United States or any state of the United
States, when such bank, credit union, savings and loan association, trust
company, savings association, savings bank, industrial bank, or
industrial loan company has federally insured deposits;
(12) Foreign adversary person means:
(a) A foreign person that is domiciled in, is headquartered in, has
its principal place of business in, or is organized under the laws of any
country listed in 15 C.F.R. 791.4;
(b) An entity with respect to which a foreign person or combination
of foreign persons described in subdivision (12)(a) of this section
directly or indirectly own at least a twenty-five percent share; or
(c) A person subject to the direction or control of a foreign person
or entity described in subdivision (12)(a) or (b) of this section;
(13) (12) In this state means at a physical location within this
state for a transaction requested in person. For a transaction requested
electronically or by telephone, the provider of money transmission may
determine if the person requesting the transaction is in this state by
relying on other information provided by such person regarding the
location of the individual's residential address or the entity's
principal place of business or other physical address location and any
records associated with such person that the provider of money
transmission may have that indicate the location of the individual's
residential address or the entity's principal place of business or other
physical address location, including, but not limited to, an address
associated with an account;
(14) (13) Individual means a natural person;
(15)(a) Informal value transfer system services means services
provided by any system, mechanism, or network of persons or entities
that:
-4-

LB1063 LB1063
2026 2026
(i) Receives money for the purpose of making the funds or an
equivalent value payable to a third party in another geographic location,
whether or not in the same form; or
(ii) Facilitates the transfer of money domestically or
internationally outside the conventional money-transmission system.
(b) Informal value transfer system services includes hawala systems
or agencies or similar systems or agencies for transferring money by
payment to an agent who instructs a remote associate to pay a final
recipient.
(c) Informal value transfer system services does not include armored
car services or issuance of gift cards;
(16) (14) Key individual means any individual ultimately responsible
for establishing or directing policies and procedures of the licensee,
such as an executive officer, manager, director, or trustee;
(17) (15) Licensee means a person licensed under the Nebraska Money
Transmitters Act;
(18) (16) Material litigation means litigation, that according to
United States generally accepted accounting principles, is significant to
a person's financial health and would be required to be disclosed in the
person's annual audited financial statements, report to shareholders, or
similar records;
(19) (17) Model Money Transmission Modernization Act means the Model
Money Transmission Modernization Act approved for state adoption by the
Conference of State Bank Supervisors Board of Directors that sets
nationwide standards, including net worth, surety bond, and permissible
investments requirements, to modernize the supervision and regulation of
money transmitters;
(20) (18) Monetary value means a medium of exchange, whether or not
redeemable in money;
(21) (19) Money means a medium of exchange that is authorized or
adopted by the United States or a foreign government. Money includes a
-5-

LB1063 LB1063
2026 2026
monetary unit of account established by an intergovernmental organization
or by agreement between two or more governments;
(22)(a) (20)(a) Money transmission means any of the following:
(i) Selling or issuing payment instruments to a person located in
this state;
(ii) Selling or issuing stored value to a person located in this
state; and
(iii) Receiving money for transmission from a person located in this
state.
(b) Money transmission includes payroll processing services and
informal value transfer system services. Money transmission does not
include the provision solely of online or telecommunications services or
network access;
(23) (21) Multistate licensing process means any agreement entered
into by and among state regulators relating to coordinated processing of
applications for money transmission licenses, applications for the
acquisition of control of a licensee, control determinations, or notice
and information requirements for a change of key individuals;
(24) (22) Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry means
the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry, also known as the
Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry, developed by the
Conference of State Bank Supervisors and the American Association of
Residential Mortgage Regulators and owned and operated by the State
Regulatory Registry LLC, or any successor or affiliated entity, for the
licensing and registration of persons in financial services industries;
(25)(a) (23)(a) Outstanding money transmission obligation means:
(i) Any payment instrument or stored value issued or sold by the
licensee to a person located in the United States or reported as sold by
an authorized delegate of the licensee to a person that is located in the
United States that has not yet been paid or refunded by or for the
licensee or has been escheated in accordance with applicable abandoned
-6-

LB1063 LB1063
2026 2026
property laws; or
(ii) Any money received for transmission by the licensee or an
authorized delegate in the United States from a person located in the
United States that has not been received by the payee or refunded to the
sender or has been escheated in accordance with applicable abandoned
property laws.
(b) For purposes of subdivision (25) (23) of this section, in the
United States includes, to the extent applicable, a person in any state,
territory, or possession of the United States; the District of Columbia;
the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico; or a United States military installation
that is located in a foreign country;
(26) (24) Payment instrument means a written or electronic check,
draft, money order, traveler's check, or other written or electronic
instrument for the transmission or payment of money or monetary value,
whether or not negotiable. Payment instrument does not include stored
value or any instrument that:
(a) Is redeemable by the issuer only for goods or services provided
by the issuer or affiliates of such issuer or franchisees of the issuer
or affiliates of such franchisees except to the extent the instrument is
required by applicable law to be redeemable in cash for the cash value of
the instrument; or
(b) Is not sold publicly but issued and distributed as part of a
loyalty, rewards, or promotional program;
(27) (25) Payroll processing services means receiving money for
transmission pursuant to a contract with a person to deliver wages or
salaries, make payment of payroll taxes to state and federal agencies,
make payments relating to employee benefit plans, or make distributions
of other authorized deductions from wages or salaries. Payroll processing
services does not include an employer performing payroll processing
services on the employer's own behalf or on behalf of an affiliate of the
employer;
-7-

LB1063 LB1063
2026 2026
(28) (26) Person means any individual, general partnership, limited
partnership, limited liability company, corporation, trust, association,
joint stock corporation, or other corporate entity identified by the
director;
(29) (27) Receipt means a paper receipt, electronic record, or other
written confirmation;
(30) (28) Receiving money for transmission or money received for
transmission means receiving money or monetary value in the United States
for transmission within or outside the United States by electronic or
other means;
(31) (29) Remit means to make direct payments of money to a licensee
or a representative of a licensee authorized to receive money or to
deposit money in a bank in an account specified by the licensee; and
(32) (30) Stored value means monetary value representing a claim
against the issuer of the stored value evidenced by an electronic or
digital record, and that is intended and accepted for use as a means of
redemption for money or monetary value, or payment for goods or services.
Stored value includes, but is not limited to, prepaid access as defined
by 31 C.F.R. 1010.100. Notwithstanding the foregoing, stored value does
not include a payment instrument or closed loop stored value, or stored
value not sold publicly but issued and distributed as part of a loyalty,
rewards, or promotional program.
Sec. 3. Section 8-2711, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
8-2711 (1) Applicants for a license shall apply in a form and in a
medium as prescribed by the director. Each such form shall contain
content as set forth by rule, regulation, instruction, or procedure of
the director and may be changed or updated by the director in accordance
with applicable law in order to carry out the purposes of the Nebraska
Money Transmitters Act and maintain consistency with Nationwide Mortgage
Licensing System and Registry licensing standards and practices. The
-8-

LB1063 LB1063
2026 2026
application shall state or contain, as applicable:
(a) The legal name and residential and business addresses of the
applicant and any fictitious or trade name used by the applicant in
conducting the applicant's business;
(b) A list of any criminal conviction of the applicant and any
material litigation in which the applicant has been involved in the ten-
year period next preceding the submission of the application;
(c) A description of any money transmission previously provided by
the applicant and the money transmission that the applicant seeks to
provide in this state;
(d) A list of the applicant's proposed authorized delegates and the
locations in this state where the applicant and its authorized delegates
propose to engage in money transmission;
(e) A list of other states in which the applicant is licensed to
engage in money transmission and any license revocation, suspension, or
other disciplinary action taken against the applicant in another state;
(f) Information concerning any bankruptcy or receivership proceeding
affecting the applicant or a person in control of an applicant;
(g) A sample form of contract for authorized delegates, if
applicable;
(h) A sample form of payment instrument or stored value, as
applicable;
(i) The name and address of any federally insured depository
financial institution through which the applicant plans to conduct money
transmission; and
(j) A certification that the applicant is not a foreign adversary
person, along with sufficient information to enable the director to
verify the veracity of the certification;
(k) A certification that each key individual and person in control
of the applicant is not a foreign adversary person, along with sufficient
information to enable the director to verify the veracity of the
-9-

LB1063 LB1063
2026 2026
certification; and
(l) (j) Any other information the Director or the Nationwide
Mortgage Licensing System and Registry reasonably requires with respect
to the applicant.
(2) If an applicant is a corporation, limited liability company,
partnership, or other legal entity, the applicant shall also provide:
(a) The date of the applicant's incorporation or formation and state
or country of incorporation or formation;
(b) If applicable, a certificate of good standing from the state or
country in which the applicant was incorporated or formed;
(c) A brief description of the structure or organization of the
applicant, including any parents or subsidiaries of the applicant, and
whether any such parents or subsidiaries are publicly traded;
(d) The legal name, any fictitious or trade name, all business and
residential addresses, and the employment, as applicable, of each key
individual and person in control of the applicant in the ten-year period
preceding the submission of the application;
(e) A list of any criminal convictions and material litigation for a
person in control of the applicant that is not an individual that has
been involved with the applicant in the ten-year period preceding the
submission of the application;
(f) A copy of audited financial statements of the applicant for the
most recent fiscal year and for the two-year period preceding the
submission of the application or, if determined to be acceptable to the
director, certified unaudited financial statements for the most recent
fiscal year or any other period acceptable to the director;
(g) A certified copy of unaudited financial statements of the
applicant for the most recent fiscal quarter;
(h) If the applicant is a publicly traded corporation, a copy of the
most recent report filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission
pursuant to the Securities Exchange Act of 1934;
-10-

LB1063 LB1063
2026 2026
(i) If the applicant is a wholly owned subsidiary of:
(i) A corporation publicly traded in the United States, a copy of
audited financial statements for the parent corporation for the most
recent fiscal year or a copy of the parent corporation's most recent
report filed pursuant to the Securities Exchange Act of 1934; or
(ii) A corporation publicly traded outside the United States, a copy
of similar documentation filed with the regulator of the parent
corporation's domicile outside the United States;
(j) The name and address of the applicant's registered agent in this
state; and
(k) Any other information the director reasonably requires with
respect to the applicant.
(3) A nonrefundable application fee of one thousand five hundred
dollars must accompany an application for a license under this section.
(4) Other than the nonrefundable application fee, the director may
waive one or more requirements of this section or permit an applicant to
submit other information in lieu of the required information.
Sec. 4. Section 8-2742, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
8-2742 For purposes of the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act:
(1) 15 C.F.R. 791.4 means 15 C.F.R. 791.4, as such regulation
existed on January 1, 2026;
(2) (1) 31 C.F.R. 1010.100 means 31 C.F.R. 1010.100, as such
regulation existed on January 1, 2025;
(3) (2) Bank Secrecy Act means the Bank Secrecy Act, 31 U.S.C. 5311
et seq., and the implementing regulations of such act, as such act and
regulations existed on January 1, 2025;
(4) (3) Bank Service Company Act means the Bank Service Company Act,
12 U.S.C. 1861 et seq., as such act existed on January 1, 2025;
(5) (4) Commodity Exchange Act means the Commodity Exchange Act, 7
U.S.C. 1 et seq., as such act existed on January 1, 2025;
-11-

LB1063 LB1063
2026 2026
(6) (5) Edge Act means the Edge Act, 12 U.S.C. 611 et seq., as such
act existed on January 1, 2025;
(7) (6) Federal Credit Union Act means the Federal Credit Union Act,
12 U.S.C. 1751 et seq., as such act existed on January 1, 2025;
(8) (7) Federal Deposit Insurance Act means the Federal Deposit
Insurance Act, 12 U.S.C. 1811 et seq., as such act existed on January 1,
2025;
(9) (8) Federal remittance rule means 12 C.F.R. part 1005, subpart
B, as such regulation existed on January 1, 2025;
(10) (9) Foreign Account Tax Compliance Act means the Foreign
Account Tax Compliance Act, 26 U.S.C. 1471 et seq., as such act existed
on January 1, 2025;
(11) (10) International Banking Act of 1978 means the International
Banking Act of 1978, 12 U.S.C. 3101 et seq., as such act existed on
January 1, 2025;
(12) (11) Securities Exchange Act of 1934 means the Securities
Exchange Act of 1934, 15 U.S.C. 78a et seq., as such act existed on
January 1, 2025;
(13) (12) United States Bankruptcy Code means 11 U.S.C. 101 et seq.,
as such sections existed on January 1, 2025; and
(14) (13) Uniting and Strengthening America by Providing Appropriate
Tools Required to Intercept and Obstruct Terrorism Act of 2001 means the
Uniting and Strengthening America by Providing Appropriate Tools Required
to Intercept and Obstruct Terrorism Act of 2001, Public Law 107-56, as
such act existed on January 1, 2025.
Sec. 5. The Legislature finds and declares that:
(1) The United States has determined that the governments of China,
Cuba, Iran, North Korea, Russia, and the Maduro Regime in Venezuela are
foreign adversaries of the United States because they have engaged in
long-term patterns or serious instances of conduct significantly adverse
to United States national security or the security and safety of United
-12-

LB1063 LB1063
2026 2026
States persons;
(2) China's effort to advance its technological capabilities poses
significant threats to the United States and its citizens;
(3) China is currently operating a Military-Civil Fusion strategy
with the goal of developing the most technologically advanced military in
the world. A key part of this strategy is removing barriers between
China's civilian sectors and its military and defense industrial sectors;
(4) China is also seeking to grow its technological dominance in
international markets;
(5) To advance its missions, China has increased its efforts to
collect foreign data;
(6) Under Article 7 of China's National Intelligence Law of 2017,
which states in part that any organization or citizen shall support,
assist, and cooperate with the state intelligence work, China may compel
its citizens and companies to assist with surveillance efforts or
surrender data to Chinese intelligence agencies, including data belonging
to the United States or its citizens;
(7) China's collection of data is a threat to national security and
the United States Department of Homeland Security and the National
Counterintelligence and Security Center have both issued publications
warning United States citizens and businesses of the potential threats
stemming from China's intelligence laws;
(8) In November 2025, the White House produced a security memo
asserting that a Chinese technology company shares its customers' data,
including customers' payment records, with the Chinese government and
concurrently the Pentagon sent a letter to Congress indicating intent to
list that Chinese technology company as a Chinese military company;
(9) The threat of data collection by foreign adversaries is not only
a national security threat but also a threat to consumers who provide
data and other information to foreign adversary-based companies;
(10) Pursuant to this state's supervisory authority over financial
-13-

LB1063 LB1063
2026 2026
transactions, the state has put in place a regulatory scheme for
licensing money transmitters;
(11) Money transmitters provide consumers with nonbank access to
sending and receiving funds, often internationally, and require access to
sensitive customer data;
(12) As a part of the licensing scheme, the state looks at the
character and general fitness of applicants to ensure that it is in the
interest of the public to permit the applicant to engage in money
transmission in the state; and
(13) Due to the risks posed by foreign adversaries to this state and
its citizens, the state finds that it should not grant money transmitter
licenses to companies with connections to foreign adversaries.
Sec. 6. (1)(a) For purposes of section 8-2713, if an applicant or
any key individual or person in control of the applicant fails to
establish that such applicant, key individual, or person is not a foreign
adversary person, the director shall presume that the character and
general fitness of such applicant, key individual, or person indicates
that it is not in the interest of the public to permit the applicant to
engage in money transmission.
(b) For purposes of section 8-2716, if a person, or group of persons
acting in concert, seeking to acquire control of a licensee or if any key
individual or person that would be in control of a licensee after
acquisition of control fails to establish that such person, group, or key
individual is not a foreign adversary person, the director shall presume
that the character and general fitness of such person, group, or key
individual indicates that it is not in the interest of the public to
permit the person, group of persons acting in concert, or key individual
to control the licensee.
(c) For purposes of section 8-2734, if a licensee or authorized
delegate or any key individual or persons in control of a licensee or
responsible person of the authorized delegate fails to establish that
-14-

LB1063 LB1063
2026 2026
such licensee, delegate, key individual, or person is not a foreign
adversary person, the director shall presume that the character and
general fitness of such licensee, delegate, key individual, or person
indicates that it is not in the interest of the public to permit the
licensee, delegate, key individual, or person to provide money
transmission.
(d) For purposes of section 8-2735, if an authorized delegate or a
person in control of the authorized delegate fails to establish that such
delegate or person is not a foreign adversary person, the director shall
presume that the character and general fitness of such delegate or person
indicates that it is not in the interest of the public to permit the
authorized delegate to provide money transmission.
(2) The presumptions described in subsection (1) of this section
shall only be rebutted by clear and convincing evidence that:
(a) The relevant foreign government or foreign nongovernment person
listed in 15 C.F.R. 791.4 has expressly exempted the relevant applicant,
licensee, authorized delegate, key individual, or person from all legal
obligations to share any information from an individual in this state
with any foreign adversary person;
(b) The exemption described in subdivision (2)(a) of this section
will be judicially enforceable within this state against the foreign
government and nongovernment person by any individual in this state who
uses the money transmitter services of the exempted individual or person;
(c) The exempted individual or person has established a relationship
with an auditor organized within, and with its primary place of business
within, the United States that will verify, through an external
compliance audit or similar process conducted at least quarterly and in
compliance with all applicable auditing standards, whether any
information is shared by the exempted individual or person with a foreign
adversary person during the duration of the license or at any point
within three years after the expiration of the license; and
-15-

LB1063 LB1063
2026 2026
(d) The exempted individual or person has adopted a policy that it
will promptly notify all affected individuals and the Attorney General if
it or its auditor concludes that information has been shared with a
foreign adversary person during the duration of the license or at any
point within three years after the expiration of the license.
Sec. 7. (1) On the effective date of this act, the changes made by
this legislative bill shall apply to all existing and future licenses and
applications for license under the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act.
(2) Within sixty days after the effective date of this act, the
director shall send a written request to each licensee and applicant with
a completed application that requests supplemental information necessary
for the director to investigate and determine compliance with the changes
made by this legislative bill, including the certifications required by
section 8-2711. For any licensee that does not provide such information
within sixty days after receiving such request or that the director has
reasonable suspicion to believe is a foreign adversary person or has any
key individual or person in control that is a foreign adversary person,
the director shall institute proceedings under section 8-2734 to revoke
the licensee's license.
Sec. 8. Within thirty days after the effective date of this act,
the director shall prescribe forms and instructions and issue an order
governing applications under the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act to
require information sufficient to show that the applicant is not a
foreign adversary person.
Sec. 9. Original sections 8-2701, 8-2702, 8-2711, and 8-2742,
Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, are repealed.
-16-